Louisiana, session 2026, HB635.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part IV-A of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 14:391 through 391.3, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART IV-A. PROTECTION OF CONSTITUTIONAL LIBERTIES
IN LOUISIANA ACT
§391. Legislative intent; short title
A. The legislature hereby finds that certain foreign adversaries and foreign
terrorist organizations pose a growing threat to the citizens and residents of this state
based on the practice of extranational enforcement of foreign laws, foreign
directives, or foreign religious tenets that are contrary to the Constitution of the
United States and the Constitution of Louisiana and are invoked as a substitute for
federal or state law. The purpose of this Part is to counter this threat by protecting
persons in this state from the harassment and repression of liberty and freedom
caused by these extranational practices.
B. This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "Protection of
Constitutional Liberties in Louisiana Act".
§391.1. Definitions
For the purposes of this Part, the following terms have the following
meanings:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 635 ENROLLED
(1) "Agent of a foreign adversary" means a person, entity, or organization
directed or controlled by a foreign adversary or who is the proxy of a foreign
adversary.
(2) "Agent of a foreign terrorist organization" means a person, entity, or
group directed or controlled by a foreign terrorist organization or who is the proxy
of a foreign terrorist organization.
(3) "Constitutionally protected conduct" means any action or behavior that
is lawful under the laws of this state or the United States and constitutes the free
exercise of any of the following:
(a) Freedom of religion, as protected by the First Amendment of the
Constitution of the United States of America and Article I, Section 8, of the
Constitution of Louisiana.
(b) Freedom of speech or expression, as protected by the First Amendment
of the Constitution of the United States and Article I, Section 7, of the Constitution
of Louisiana.
(c) The right of assembly or to petition any federal, state, or local
government entity for the redress of grievances as protected by the First Amendment
of the Constitution of the United States and Article I, Section 9, of the Constitution
of Louisiana.
(4) "Foreign adversary" means any country specified in 15 CFR 791.4 or any
similar regulation that is subsequently promulgated in the Code of Federal
Regulations.
(5) "Foreign law" means any law, rule, or legal code or system established
and used or applied by a foreign adversary or foreign terrorist organization in a
jurisdiction outside of the states or territories of the United States.
(6) "Foreign terrorist organization" means any of the following:
(a) An entity designated as a foreign terrorist organization in accordance
with 8 U.S.C. 1189 or any similar law that is subsequently promulgated by the
United States Department of State.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 635 ENROLLED
(b) An entity designated as a "specially designated national" in accordance
with 31 CFR 515.306 or any similar regulation that is subsequently promulgated in
the Code of Federal Regulations by the United States Department of the Treasury.
(7) "Transnational repression" means an act emanating from or attributable
to a foreign adversary or foreign terrorist organization that is committed by an agent
of that foreign adversary or foreign terrorist organization with the intent to harass,
intimidate, censor, or otherwise extend the ability of the foreign adversary or foreign
terrorist organization to influence, control, or impose its preferences on the behavior
of people outside of the territorial jurisdiction of the foreign adversary through either
of the following means:
(a) Directly by means of physical contact, threats, or electronic targeting.
(b) Indirectly by means of actual or credible threats of collective punishment,
financial coercion, abuse of administrative processes, selective prosecution of laws
of general application, the use or direction of social media or telecommunication
entities, or harassment of others.
§391.2. Violation; penalties
A.(1) No agent of a foreign adversary or agent of a foreign terrorist
organization shall commit any criminal offense in this state while knowingly acting
at the direction of, on behalf of, or under the influence of a foreign adversary or
foreign terrorist organization with the intent to do any of the following:
(a) Coerce a person to act on behalf of a foreign adversary or foreign terrorist
organization.
(b) Coerce a person to leave the United States or cause another person to
leave the United States.
(c) Cause a person to refrain from engaging in constitutionally protected
conduct.
(d) Retaliate against a person for engaging in constitutionally protected
conduct.
(2) No person shall intentionally engage in the obstruction, detection,
investigation, monitoring, or surveillance of another person or governmental entity
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 635 ENROLLED
with the intent to enforce or institute the prosecution of a foreign law in violation of
the laws of this state or of the United States.
B.(1) Any person who violates the provisions of Paragraph (A)(1) of this
Section by committing a criminal offense that is a noncapital felony shall, in addition
to the penalty for commission of the underlying offense, be punished as follows:
(a) If the underlying offense is punishable by imprisonment for a term of not
more than five years, the offender shall be imprisoned with or without hard labor for
an additional period of one year. The additional penalty imposed pursuant to this
Subparagraph shall be served consecutively to the sentence imposed for the
underlying offense.
(b) If the underlying offense is punishable by imprisonment for a term of
more than five years but less than fifteen years, the offender shall be imprisoned with
or without hard labor for an additional period of two years. The additional penalty
imposed pursuant to this Subparagraph shall be served consecutively to the sentence
imposed for the underlying offense.
(2) Whoever violates the provisions of Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section shall
be punished as follows:
(a) If the offender was acting as an agent of a foreign adversary or an agent
of a foreign terrorist organization at the time of the violation, the offender shall be
fined not more than ten thousand dollars, imprisoned with or without hard labor for
not less than three years nor more than six years, or both.
(b) If the offender was not acting as an agent of a foreign adversary or an
agent of a foreign terrorist organization at the time of the violation, the offender shall
be fined not more than five thousand dollars, imprisoned with or without hard labor
for not less than two years nor more than four years, or both.
§391.3. Application of foreign law; unenforceability
Any decision from a court, arbitrator, tribunal, or administrative agency that
is based in whole or in part on foreign law is void and unenforceable in this state if
it denies a party a liberty, right, or privilege guaranteed by the Constitution of the
United States or the Constitution of Louisiana.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 635 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 40:2405.10 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2405.10. Transnational repression recognition and response; training and education
The Department of Justice, office of the attorney general, Louisiana Bureau
of Investigation, may provide or adopt a training program for transnational
repression recognition and response. The program may be obtained from another
state or federal governmental entity or from a nongovernmental entity that
specializes in training and educating law enforcement. The training may be updated
to address emerging threats and specific information on tactics used by specific
foreign adversaries or foreign terrorist organizations.
Section 3. The Department of Justice, office of the attorney general, Louisiana
Bureau of Investigation may implement the training program authorized in R.S. 40:2405.10
as enacted by Section 2 of this Act on or before July 1, 2027.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.